Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB843.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 11.2(a)(1) and (b) of the act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1176, No.261), known as the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act, are amended to read:Section 11.2. Closure of Manufactured Home Communities.--(a) In the event of the closure of a manufactured home community, in whole or part, the manufactured home community owner shall:(1) Provide written notice to the residents and tenants of the community, to the resident association if one exists, to the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency and to the municipality where the manufactured home community is located within 60 days of deciding to close the community[.], at least 120 days prior to the discontinuance of the use of the land as a manufactured 12345678910111213141516171819 home community or the proposed closing upon the sale of the manufactured home community, whichever is earlier. The notice shall include the estimated date residents and tenants will be expected to vacate the community, which shall be no less than 180 days from the date of the notice, and the estimated date the community will be closed.* * *(b) A manufactured home community owner shall consider any offer to purchase the community made by a resident association representing at least 25% of the manufactured home spaces or by a nonprofit corporation, including a community development corporation, housing authority or redevelopment authority acting at the request of the residents of at least 25% of the spaces and shall negotiate in good faith with the entity submitting the offer. The following procedures apply:(1) The resident association or authority representing the interests of the residents , notwithstanding if the association is formally recognized, may notify the owner of the manufactured home community that it is interested in purchasing the manufactured home community. The following apply to notice: (i) The notice must be made to the owner of the manufactured home community within 30 days after the owner of the manufactured home community notifies residents of the closure of the manufactured home community.(ii) A copy of the notice may be filed with the municipality in which the manufactured home community is located.(iii) If notice is given, the resident association shall have 30 days after the notice has been given to purchase the manufactured home community through negotiation, to reach an agreement with the manufactured home community owner for 20250HB0843PN0873 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchase of the manufactured home community and to close on the sale. Upon the request of the resident association, the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall assist the resident association in developing financing for the purchase of the manufactured home community.(2) If the resident association and the manufactured home community owner cannot agree upon a purchase price, the resident association shall have the right to purchase the property:(i) if the resident association matches the essential provisions of an existing bona fide offer to purchase the manufactured home community made by another potential purchaser which the owner is prepared to accept; or(ii) if there is no offer under subparagraph (i), the manufactured home community owner shall sell the manufactured home community to the resident association at a purchase price to be established by an appraiser chosen by the resident association and the manufactured home community owner.(3) A manufactured home community owner may not unreasonably refuse to enter into, or unreasonably delay the execution or closing on, a purchase and sale agreement with a resident association that has made a bona fide offer to meet the price and substantially equivalent terms and conditions of an offer for which notice is required to be given under this subsection.(4) If the two parties cannot agree upon one appraiser, either party may notify the other, in writing, of the disagreement. The following procedures apply:(i) The resident association shall choose an appraiser, the manufactured home community owner shall choose an appraiser and the two appraisers shall choose a third appraiser.(ii) The three appraisers under subparagraph (i) shall 20250HB0843PN0873 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establish a value of the manufactured home community.(iii) If the manufactured home community owner refuses to select an appraiser within 15 days of the notice, the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall choose an appraiser for the manufactured home community owner.(iv) The costs of appraisers shall be paid equally by the resident association and the manufactured home community owner.(5) If, within 30 days from the mailing of the notice under paragraph (1), an agreement for the sale of the manufactured home community signed by the resident association and the manufactured home community owner has not been filed upon the land records, or if the resident association has not filed a certified statement to purchase the manufactured home community at the appraised value which value shall also be certified on the land records by the appraiser or appraisers, the right to purchase the manufactured home community shall be void and any recorded notice filed under paragraph (1) shall be void.(6) A resident association that has the right to purchase under this subsection may, at its election, assign its purchase rights to the municipality where the resident association is located, the housing authority for its area, an agency of the Commonwealth or a nonprofit organization for the purpose of continuing the use of the property as a manufactured home community.(7) The requirements of paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5) and (6) shall apply separately to each substantially different offer to sell or purchase a manufactured home community.(8) Paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7) shall not apply if:(i) the sale, lease or transfer is to a family member of the 20250HB0843PN0873 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owner or to a trust, the beneficiaries of which are family members of the owner;(ii) the transfer is by gift, devise or required by operation of law;(iii) the sale, lease or transfer is by a partnership to one or more of its partners;(iv) the conveyance of an interest in the manufactured home community is incidental to the financing of such manufactured home community;(v) the lease is the lease of a lot within the manufactured home community to a person who will live in a manufactured home on the lot;(vi) the sale, lease or transfer is between joint tenants or tenants in common; or(vii) the sale is made by eminent domain.(9) An owner of a manufactured home community who sells the manufactured home community to residents of the manufactured home community in compliance with the requirements of this act shall be exempt from payment of State conveyance taxes otherwise due based on the sale price of the manufactured home community, provided that the entity purchasing the manufactured home community is owned by at least 25% of the residents of the manufactured home community or an organization exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.), and that the sale terms require the guaranteed maintenance of the property as a manufactured home community.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0843PN0873 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829